Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.290

Periodic review of plans for bicycle, pedestrian, and equestrian facilities.

The house and senate transportation committees shall periodically review the six-year comprehensive plans submitted by cities and counties for expenditures for bicycle, pedestrian, and equestrian facilities prepared pursuant to RCW 35.77.010 and 36.81.121.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 235 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 268 s 2. Formerly RCW 44.40.120.]